Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-241
Board of Barber Examiners; reciprocal agreement; conditions.

In negotiating any reciprocal agreement, the Board of Barber Examiners shall be governed by the following:

(1) When the laws of any state or country or the rules of the authorities of such state or country place any requirement or disability upon any person licensed in this state to practice barbering which affects the right of such person to be licensed or to practice his or her profession in such other state, then the same requirement or disability shall be placed upon any person licensed in such state or country when applying for a license to practice in this state; and

(2) When any examining board has established by rule any special conditions upon which reciprocal agreements shall be entered into, as provided in section 71-242, such condition shall be incorporated into the reciprocal agreements negotiated with reference to licenses to practice barbering in any classification in which such examining board conducts examinations.

Laws 1983, LB 87, § 4.